test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-muusik_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - muusik: # 1B v-k, k-kk
    muusik+N+Sg+Nom: muusik
    muusik+N+Sg+Gen: muusik
    muusik+N+Sg+Acc: muusik
    muusik+N+Sg+Ill: musikkân
    muusik+N+Sg+Loc: musikkist
    muusik+N+Sg+Com: musikkáin
    muusik+N+Sg+Abe: muusikttáá
    muusik+N+Pl+Nom: musikkeh
    muusik+N+Pl+Gen: musikkij
    muusik+N+Pl+Acc: musikkijd
    muusik+N+Pl+Ill: musikkáid
    muusik+N+Pl+Loc: musikkijn
    muusik+N+Pl+Com: musikkijguin
    muusik+N+Pl+Abe: musikkijttáá
